Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of


Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services from any monies not


otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State


Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of Twenty


Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be


necessary to pay Title XIX costs remaining for the fiscal year


ending June 30, 2025.


SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of


Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services from any monies not


otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State


Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of


Eighteen Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($18,500,000.00) or


so much thereof as may be necessary to provide payments for


providers through the Enhanced Tier Payment System. Such funds

Req. No. 3101 Page 1


shall be used to supplement rather than replace existing resources


and programs.


SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of


Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services from any monies not


otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State


Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the sum of


Thirty-two Million Dollars ($32,000,000.00) or so much thereof as


may be necessary to renew contracts with service providers that were


in effect in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, but not renewed


for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3101 WR 12/30/2025 3:55:30 PM

















Req. No. 3101 Page 2